Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4131.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [1.1467] STATE MINERAL. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Iron ore. new text end new text begin Iron ore is the official mineral of the state of Minnesota. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Photograph. new text end new text begin A photograph and a typical specimen of iron ore shall be preserved in the Office of the Secretary of State. new text end